District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.24

Repealed

Wheelchair-Accessible Taxicab Promotion Fund.

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 20e
as added Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 6052, 54 DCR 7052
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 215(e), 56 DCR 1117
Oct. 22, 2012, D.C. Law 19-184, § 2(r), 59 DCR 9431
2001 Ed., §  50-324.
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in the section designation.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 6052 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short title: Section 6051 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle F of title VI of the act may be cited as the “Wheelchair-Accessible Taxicab Promotion Fund Act of 2007”.

Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.

Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-184 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7007 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-184, § 7.